New Jersey, session 221, A2577.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   As used in this section, State assessment means an assessment required pursuant to State or federal law and administered to all students in a specific grade level or subject area and whose results are aggregated for analysis at the district, school, or student subgroup level. b.    The Commissioner of Education shall develop guidelines by September 1, 2023 that provide best practices for school districts in preparing students for taking the State assessment tests, including guidelines on limiting the amount of instructional time to be spent on test preparation for the State assessments. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.